Utah statutes.
48-3a-114.   Operating agreement -- Effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of limited liability company.

(1)  An operating agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the operating agreement or the satisfaction of a condition.  An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

(2)  The obligations of a limited liability company and its members to a person in the person's capacity as a transferee or a person dissociated as a member are governed by the operating agreement.  Subject only to a court order issued under Subsection 48-3a-503(2)(b) to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the operating agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or is dissociated as a member:

(a)  is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company or its members to the person in the person's capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a member; and

(b)  is not effective to the extent the amendment imposes a new debt, obligation, or other liability on the transferee or person dissociated as a member.

(3)  If a record delivered by a limited liability company to the division for filing becomes effective and contains a provision that would be ineffective under Subsection 48-3a-112(3) or (4)(c) if contained in the operating agreement, the provision is ineffective in the record.

(4)  Subject to Subsection (3), if a record delivered by a limited liability company to the division for filing becomes effective and conflicts with a provision of the operating agreement:

(a)  the operating agreement prevails as to members, persons dissociated as members, transferees, and managers; and

(b)  the record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

